test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-oskayi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - osk-ây - ok : # -m inanimate noun, new thing, Wolvengrey
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Sg: osk-âyi
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitôsk-âyim
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitôsk-âyim
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitôsk-âyiminân
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitôsk-âyiminaw
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitôsk-âyimiwâw
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: otôsk-âyim
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: otôsk-âyimiwâw
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: otôsk-âyimiyiw
     
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Pl: osk-âya
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitôsk-âyima
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitôsk-âyima
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitôsk-âyiminâna
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitôsk-âyiminawa
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitôsk-âyimiwâwa
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: otôsk-âyima
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: otôsk-âyimiwâwa
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: otôsk-âyimiyiwa
     
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Loc: osk-âyihk
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitôsk-âyimihk
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitôsk-âyimihk
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitôsk-âyiminâhk
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitôsk-âyiminâhk
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitôsk-âyimiwâhk
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: otôsk-âyimihk
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: otôsk-âyimiwâhk
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: otôsk-âyimiyihk
     
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: osk-âyis
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: osk-âyisak
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: osk-âyisihk
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicôsk-âyimis
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicôsk-âyimis
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: ocôsk-âyimis
     osk-âyi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: ocôsk-âyimisiyiw
